Arkansas, session 2025, HB1453.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 18-13-102(2), concerning the definition of
"co-owner" under the Horizontal Property Act, is amended to read as follows:
(2) "Co-owner" means a person, firm, corporation, partnership,
association, trust, or other legal entity, or any combination thereof, who
owns an apartment within the building or is a member of a property owners'
association;

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code § 18-13-102(8), concerning the definition of
"person" under the Horizontal Property Act, is amended to read as follows:
(8) "Person" means an individual, firm, corporation,
partnership, association, trust, member of a property owners' association, or
other legal entity, or any combination thereof;

SECTION 3. Arkansas Code § 18-13-102, concerning the definitions under
the Horizontal Property Act, is amended to add additional subdivisions to
read as follows:
*ANS204*
02/03/2025 11:25:52 AM ANS204

HB1453
(12) "Business day" means a Monday, Tuesday, Wednesday,
Thursday, or Friday that is not otherwise observed as an official state or
federal holiday;
(13) "Local government" means:
(A) A county;
(B) A city of the first class, a city of the second class,
or an unincorporated town; or
(C) Any other state entity or political subdivision of the
state or an agency, board, or commission of the state entity or political
subdivision of the state; and
(14) "Property owners' association" means an incorporated
nonprofit organization operating under recorded land agreements through which
each:
(A) Lot owner in a planned unit or other described land
area is automatically a member; and
(B) Lot is automatically subject to a charge for a
proportionate share of the expenses for the organization's activities and
services.

SECTION 4. Arkansas Code § 18-13-108(b), concerning the administration
and bylaws of a horizontal property regime, is amended to read as follows:
(b) The bylaws must necessarily shall provide for at least the
following:
(1) Form of administration, indicating whether this shall be in
charge of an administrator or of a board of administration, or otherwise, and
specifying the powers, manner of removal, and, where proper, the compensation
thereof;
(2) Method of calling or summoning the co-owners to assemble,
that a majority of at least fifty-one percent (51%) is required to adopt
decisions, who is to preside over the meeting, and who will keep the minute
book wherein the resolutions shall be recorded;
(3) Care, upkeep, and surveillance of the building and its
general or limited common elements and services;
(4) Manner of collecting from the co-owners for the payment of
the common expenses; and
(5) Designation and dismissal of the personnel necessary for the
02/03/2025 11:25:52 AM ANS204

HB1453
works and the general or limited common services of the building;
(6) Establishment of any fee structure, expenses, and
assessments; and
(7) Manner of making changes to any fee structure, expenses, and
assessments.

SECTION 5. Arkansas Code § 18-13-109 is amended to read as follows:
18-13-109. Modification of administration.
(a) The sole owner of the building or, if there is more than one (1),
the co-owners representing two-thirds (⅔) of the total value of the building
may, at any time, modify the system of administration, but each one of the
particulars set forth in § 18-13-108 shall always be embodied in the bylaws
Any modifications to the system of administration or the bylaws of a
horizontal property regime organized under this subchapter shall be approved
using the procedures to adopt decisions under the bylaws of the horizontal
property regime.
(b) No such A modification made under subsection (a) of this section
may shall not be operative until it is embodied in a recorded instrument,
which shall be recorded in the same office and in the same manner as was the
master deed and original bylaws of the horizontal property regime involved.

SECTION 6. Arkansas Code § 18-13-110 is amended to read as follows:
18-13-110. Book of receipts and expenditures — Examination — Annual
financial report — Audit.
(a) The administrator, the board of administration, or other form of
administration specified in the bylaws shall:
(1) keep Keep a book with a detailed account, in chronological
order, of the receipts and expenditures affecting the building and its
administration and specifying the maintenance and repair expenses of the
common elements and any other expenses incurred; and
(2) Submit an annual financial report to co-owners.
(b) Both the book and the vouchers accrediting the entries made
thereupon All financial records shall be available for examination by all the
co-owners at convenient hours on working days that shall be set and announced
for general knowledge during a business day.
(c)(1) A property owners' association organized under this subchapter
02/03/2025 11:25:52 AM ANS204

HB1453
is subject to audit by Arkansas Legislative Audit if the property owners'
association:
(A) Receives state funding; or
(B) Provides services that are traditionally performed by
a local government.
(2) A member of the General Assembly may request an audit of a
property owners' association organized under this subchapter after approval
by the Legislative Joint Auditing Committee.

SECTION 7. Arkansas Code § 18-13-116(a)(1), concerning the liability
for expenses and assessments of a horizontal property regime, is amended to
read as follows:
(a)(1) The co-owners of the apartments and full-time residents are
bound to contribute pro rata, in the percentages computed according to § 18-
13-112, toward the expenses of administration and of maintenance and repair
of the general common elements and, in the proper case, of the limited common
elements of the building, and toward any other expense lawfully agreed upon
using the procedures to adopt decisions under the bylaws of the horizontal
property regime.

















02/03/2025 11:25:52 AM ANS204